Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 13. Change of Name

§ 811.
Procedure; form.

A person of age and sound mind may change his or her name by making, signing, sealing, and acknowledging before the judge of the Probate Division of the Superior Court of the district in which the person resides, an instrument in the following form:

STATE OF VERMONT District.
} District.
} Be it remembered, that I, A. B. of in the county of , will be hereafter known and called . In witness whereof I hereunto set my hand and seal this day of , 20 . A. B. (L. S.)

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 812.
Minor.

A minor may change his or her name by some person who, under 14 V.S.A. chapter 111, may act for him or her, making, signing, sealing, and acknowledging before the judge of the Probate Division of the Superior Court of the district in which such minor resides, an instrument in substantially the form provided in section 811 of this title. Such instrument shall be signed by the person so acting for such minor. However, the name of the minor, if over 14 years of age, shall not be changed without his or her consent given in court.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 813.
Filing of instrument.

An instrument changing the name, by virtue of sections 811 and 812 of this title, shall be filed in the Probate Division of the Superior Court of the district in which such person or minor resides.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 814.
Repealed.
1979, No. 142 (Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 815.
Repealed. 2003, No. 88 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 816.
Amendment of birth certificate.

A person, or the parent or guardian of a minor, may provide the State Registrar of Vital Records with a copy of his or her birth certificate or the birth certificate of the minor and a certified copy of a decree issued under this chapter authorizing a change of name, and request that the birth certificate be amended in accordance with the decree. The State Registrar of Vital Records shall update the Statewide Registration System and proceed in accordance with

18 V.S.A. § 5075

. Notwithstanding

18 V.S.A. § 5075

, certificates amended pursuant to this section shall have the words “Court Amended” at the top and shall show that the change of name was made pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 22, 26;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 28

, § 3, eff. May 10, 2017;

2017, No. 46

, § 57, eff. July 1, 2019.

§ 817.
Consultation of Sex Offender Registry when form filed.

Upon receipt of a change-of-name form submitted pursuant to section 811 of this title, the Probate Court shall request the Department of Public Safety to determine whether the person’s name appears on the Sex Offender Registry established by

13 V.S.A. § 5402

. If the person’s name appears on the Registry, the Probate Court shall not permit the person to change his or her name unless it finds, after permitting the Department of Public Safety to appear, that there is a compelling purpose for doing so.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 58

, § 12.